Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [342.631] DISCLOSURE OF REMEDIATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "remediated cannabis product" means any flower, concentrate, extract, or product, including but not limited to dried cannabis flower, rosin, edibles, and tinctures derived from cannabis that, at any point during cultivation, processing, or manufacturing, required and underwent a process to reduce or remove any contaminant, including but not limited to mold, mildew, pesticides, or heavy metals, to comply with the safety and testing requirements established by the office. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Labeling requirement; mandatory disclosure. new text end new text begin (a) A remediated cannabis product must comply with the labeling requirements under section 342.63. new text end new text begin (b) A licensed cannabis business must not sell, distribute, or otherwise transfer a remediated cannabis product to a consumer unless the product's primary package and marketing layer label conspicuously displays the statement required under subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Required statement. new text end new text begin A label of a remediated cannabis product must include the following statement, in a font size no smaller than the required warning statement under section 342.63, subdivision 2, clause (8), and in contrasting color to the background: "This product, or its constituent cannabis, was produced using REMEDIATED CANNABIS MATERIAL to meet state safety standards." new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Mandatory disclosure in advertising and marketing. new text end new text begin (a) All marketing, advertising, and promotional materials for a specific remediated cannabis product must include the statement required under subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (b) The requirement under paragraph (a) applies but is not limited to digital advertisements, point-of-sale displays, product menus, and online product descriptions. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Penalties; license suspension or revocation. new text end new text begin (a) The office has the authority to issue civil penalties for each violation of this section. new text end new text begin (b) The office must adopt rules establishing a schedule of civil fines for violations of this section. Fines must be no less than $1,000 for a first offense and no less than $5,000 for a second offense within a three-year period. The schedule must be based on and reflect the culpability, frequency, and severity of the violator's actions. new text end new text begin (c) If a licensed cannabis business has three or more separate and confirmed violations of this section within a five-year period, the office must suspend or revoke the cultivator or retailer license held by the business pursuant to section 342.21. The office may also initiate license revocation or suspension upon a single instance of intentional and knowing misrepresentation of a product's remediation status. new text end